California, session 20252026, SB283.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Clean Energy Safety Act of 2025.SEC. 2. Section 25545.16 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25545.16. (a) For any application submitted after January 1, 2026, the commission shall not certify an energy storage system, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25545, pursuant to this chapter, unless, within 90 days of the project applicant providing notice of completion of installation to the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression, but before commencing operations or use of the batteries, the energy storage system is inspected by the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression where the system is located. The applicant shall bear the cost of the inspection. The inspector shall be provided a copy of the documentation of the consultation required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25545.19 submitted with the application.(b) If the inspection required pursuant to subdivision (a) has not occurred within 90 days after the notice of completion, the commission may certify or approve for operation the energy storage system.(c) The commission shall include findings regarding compliance with the requirements of this section in a decision to certify an energy storage system pursuant to Section 25545.1.SEC. 3. Section 25545.19 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25545.19. (a) In an application for an energy storage system, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25545, submitted in accordance with this chapter, the applicant shall certify that, at least 30 days before submitting the application, the applicant met and conferred with the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression in the area where the energy storage system is proposed and discussed the energy storage system design, sought input on mitigating potential fire and life safety concerns, and sought input on the content of emergency action plans required by Section 761.3 of the Public Utilities Code. The application shall include documentation of this consultation, including the date, the names and titles of participants, a summary of matters discussed, and a description of how the application addresses those matters.(b) The authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression shall have 30 days to respond to the request to meet and the meeting shall occur within 60 days of the initial request, unless otherwise agreed upon between the parties.(c) If the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression declines the opportunity to meet and confer pursuant to subdivision (a), or does not respond to the request, the applicant shall document their interactions with the authority and may submit the application pursuant to this chapter.(d) The commission shall include findings regarding compliance with the requirements of this section in a decision to certify an energy storage system pursuant to Section 25545.1.SEC. 4. Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 8500) is added to Division 4.1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: CHAPTER 10. Energy Storage Systems8500. For purposes of this chapter, both of the following definitions apply:(a) “Energy storage system” means a stationary electrical energy storage system, as defined in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1201) of Part 9 of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), that is capable of storing 10 megawatthours or more of energy.(b) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, or city and county.8501. An application submitted to a local jurisdiction for an energy storage system shall include the applicant’s certification that, at least 30 days before submitting the application, the applicant met and conferred with the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression in the area where the energy storage system is proposed and discussed the energy storage system design, sought input on mitigating potential fire and life safety concerns, and sought input on the content of emergency action plans required by Section 761.3 of the Public Utilities Code. The application shall include documentation of this consultation, including the date, the names and titles of participants, a summary of fire safety matters discussed, and a description of how the application addresses those matters.8502. For any application submitted after January 1, 2026, a local jurisdiction shall not approve an energy storage system, unless the local jurisdiction requires, as a condition of approval, that after installation is complete, but before commencing operations or use of the batteries, the energy storage system is inspected by the respective authorities having jurisdiction, including the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression. The applicant shall bear the cost of the inspections. The inspector shall be provided a copy of the documentation of the initial fire official consultation submitted with the application pursuant to Section 8501.8503. (a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Dedicated-use building” has the same meaning as defined in the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(2) “Noncombustible building” means a building that meets the Type I building requirements set forth in the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(3) “Outdoor installation” means an energy storage system that is regulated by the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(b) As part of the next update to the California Building Standards Code considered after July 1, 2026, the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall review and consider proposing provisions that restrict the location of energy storage systems to dedicated-use noncombustible buildings or outdoor installations.(c) (1) In the review and consideration of limiting the use of indoor installations of energy storage systems pursuant to subdivision (b), the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall consider proposing provisions that are consistent with the efforts of the office to ensure the safe construction, installation, commission, operation, maintenance, and decommission of energy storage systems.(2) The provisions considered pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only pertain to fire and life safety considered in the California Building Standards Code development process and shall not limit the commission’s general oversight of energy storage systems.(d) As part of the review pursuant to subdivision (b), the State Fire Marshal may consider different requirements for battery technologies with different flammability and risk profiles.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1 2029, and as of that date is repealed.8504. This chapter does not prevent a local jurisdiction from adopting and enforcing laws consistent with or more protective than this chapter.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that ensuring the safety of battery energy storage systems is a matter of statewide concern. Therefore, Sections 2 to 4, inclusive, of this act, adding Sections 25545.16 and 25545.19 to the Public Resources Code and adding Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 8500) to Division 4.1 of the Public Utilities Code, address a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 2 to 4, inclusive, of this act apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.